Utah statutes.
26-15a-103.   Duties.
In connection with this chapter:
(1)  the department shall:
(a)  establish, by rule:
(i)  statewide, uniform standards for certified food safety managers;
(ii)  criteria for food safety certification examinations; and
(iii)  other provisions necessary to implement this chapter; and
(b)  approve food safety certification examinations; and
(2)  the local health department shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.
